Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201072-274
Wind or solar energy lease; rules
and regulations.

The
board may adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as it shall deem
necessary and proper to regulate the leasing of school and public lands for
wind or solar energy exploration and development pursuant to sections 72-270
to 72-274 and to prescribe such terms and conditions, including bonds, as
it shall deem necessary in order to protect the interests of the state and
its lessees.

Laws 2010, LB235, § 5.